Utah statutes.
58-42a-501.   Unprofessional conduct.
"Unprofessional conduct," as defined in Section 58-1-501 and as may be further
defined by rule, includes:
(1)  failing to develop, maintain, or contribute to a written individual
treatment plan for each patient;
(2)  failing as an occupational therapist supervisor to provide supervision as
set forth in Section 58-42a-306;
(3)  failing to report known unprofessional or unlawful conduct of persons
licensed under this chapter;
(4)  submitting billing statements to receive payment for occupational therapy
services not performed by the occupational therapist or the supervised
occupational therapist assistant;
(5)  falsifying individual treatment plans; and
(6)  failing to consult with the attending physician and coordinate care of a
patient or client who is in active, recent treatment, as defined by rule, by
that physician for the same condition.
